Maine, session 132, LD1933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2801-A, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2013, c. 588, Pt. A, §31, is
further amended to read:
4. Full-time law enforcement officer. "Full-time law enforcement officer" means a
person who possesses a current and valid certificate issued by the board pursuant to section
2803‑A and is employed as a law enforcement officer by a municipality, a county, the State,
a tribal government or any other nonfederal employer with a reasonable expectation of
working more than 1,040 hours in any one calendar year performing law enforcement
officer duties.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 147, §29, is further
amended to read:
1. Required. As a condition to the continued employment of any person as a full-time
law enforcement officer by a municipality, a county, the State, a tribal government or any
other nonfederal employer, that person must successfully complete, within the first 12
months of initial full-time employment, the basic training course at the Maine Criminal
Justice Academy approved by the board. If a person's failure to comply with this
requirement was a result of that person's failure to satisfy any of the admission standards
applicable to the basic training course and that person is subsequently employed as a full-
time law enforcement officer within 12 months of termination of the initial employment by
a municipality, a county, the State, a tribal government or any other nonfederal employer,
the person must have satisfied all the admission standards established by the board prior to
the time of hire. As a condition of continued employment as a full-time law enforcement
officer, the officer must satisfactorily maintain the basic certification by completing the
recertification requirements prescribed by the board. The board, under extenuating and
emergency circumstances in individual cases, may extend the 12-month period for not more
than 180 days. The board also, in individual cases, may waive the basic training
requirement when the facts indicate that an equivalent course has been successfully
completed.
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§2-C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. B, §57
and affected by §65, is further amended to read:
2-C. Receipt of firearms; training; procedure; liability. The Maine Criminal
Justice Academy shall provide training for municipal, county and, state and tribal law
enforcement officers regarding the proper handling, storage, safekeeping and return of
firearms and firearm accessories received pursuant to a court order under Title 19‑A,
section 4108, subsection 3 or Title 19‑A, section 4110, subsection 4. Such training must
include education concerning the prohibitions on the purchase or possession of a firearm
when a protection order has been obtained and communication with parties to protection
orders concerning such prohibitions.
In developing materials for training in domestic violence issues, the Maine Criminal Justice
Academy may consult with a statewide organization involved in advocacy for victims of
domestic violence and with an organization having statewide membership representing the
interests of firearms owners.
A law enforcement officer who receives custody of a firearm pursuant to Title 19‑A, section
4108, subsection 3 or Title 19‑A, section 4110, subsection 4 shall exercise reasonable care
Page 1 - 132LR0817(01)

415 to avoid loss, damage or reduction in value of the firearm and may not permanently mark
426 the firearm or fire the firearm unless there is reasonable suspicion that the firearm has been
437 used in the commission of a crime. Any liability for damage or reduction in value to such
448 a firearm is governed by Title 14, chapter 741.
Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§2-E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 675, §8, is
further amended to read:
2-E. Receipt of certain dangerous weapons; training; procedure; liability.
Beginning in 2020, the Maine Criminal Justice Academy Board of Trustees shall require
training as part of its mandated training schedule for municipal, county and, state and tribal
law enforcement officers regarding the process for extreme risk protection orders and the
proper handling, storage, safekeeping and return of dangerous weapons received pursuant
to an endorsement or court order under Title 34‑B, section 3862‑A or 3873‑A. The training
must include education concerning the prohibitions on the purchase, control or possession
of dangerous weapons. A law enforcement officer who receives custody of a dangerous
weapon pursuant to Title 34‑B, section 3862‑A or 3873‑A shall exercise reasonable care to
avoid loss, damage or reduction in value of the weapon and may not permanently mark or
fire the weapon unless there is reasonable suspicion that the weapon has been used in the
commission of a crime. Any liability for damage or reduction in value to such a weapon is
governed by Title 14, chapter 741.
Sec. 5. 25 MRSA §2804-E, as amended by PL 2013, c. 147, §34, is further amended
to read:
§2804-E. In-service law enforcement training
1. Required. As a condition to the continued employment of a person as a law
enforcement officer with the power to make arrests or the authority to carry a firearm in
the course of duty by a municipality, a county, the State, a tribal government or other
nonfederal employer, that person must successfully complete in-service training as
prescribed by the board. Failure to successfully complete in-service training by a law
enforcement officer as prescribed by the board constitutes grounds to suspend or revoke a
certificate issued by the board pursuant to section 2803‑A.
2. Role of board. The board shall establish in-service recertification training
requirements, consistent with subsection 1, and coordinate delivery of in-service training.
The in-service recertification training requirements must include information on new laws
and court decisions and on new enforcement practices demonstrated to reduce crime or
increase officer safety. The board shall consider and encourage the use of
telecommunications technology in the development and delivery of in-service training
programs. In establishing the recertification training requirements, the board shall
cooperate with the state and local departments and agencies and tribal governments to
which the in-service requirements apply to ensure that the standards are appropriate. In-
service training may not be applied to satisfy in-service recertification training
requirements unless it is approved by the board.
4. Credit for continuing education. The board may grant in-service training credits
to be applied to in-service recertification training requirements for courses completed at
accredited colleges and universities.
Page 2 - 132LR0817(01)

5. Provision of in-service training. In-service training programs that meet the
requirements established under subsection 2 or other in-service training programs may be
provided by the Maine Criminal Justice Academy or the agency or tribal government
employing the law enforcement officer.